Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.267

Service credit for paid leave of absence—Application to elected officials of labor organizations.

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided under the provisions of RCW 41.32.240 through * 41.32.575.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

[ 1993 c 95 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.32.575 was repealed by 1995 c 345 s 11.

Retroactive application—Effective date—1993 c 95: See notes following RCW 41.40.175.